src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON IEDNITJA !!= @CODE@ Odd syllable pluralforms only. These do not have a singular form.
                                +Cmp/PlGen:%>ij          R                ;
                                   +Pl+Nom:%>a           K-VOW            ;
                                   +Pl+Gen:%>ij          K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Acc:%>ijt         K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Ill:%>ijda        K-VOW            ;
                                   +Pl+Ine:%>ijn         K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Ela:%>ijs         K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Com:%>ij          K-CONS           ;
                                      +Ess:%>in          K-CONS           ;
                                          :%>a           DAGI_SINGULAR    ;
                                          :%>i           DAGI_PLURAL      ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»attja%>      K-VOW            ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»attja%>j     K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»attja%>jt    K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»attja%>jda   K-VOW            ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»attja%>jn    K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»attja%>js    K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»attja%>j     K-CONS           ;
                         +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:attja         DAGI_PLURAL      ;
                     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»attja%>n     K-CONS           ;
                     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+Use/NG:»adtja%>n     K-CONS           ; !Gives iednitjadtjan, barely not used
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»attja»tja    K-VOW            ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»attja»tjij   K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»attja»tjijt  K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»attja»tjijda K-VOW            ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»attja»tjijn  K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»attja»tjijs  K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»attja»tjij   K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»attja»tjin   K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
!                                         :»             DenominalAdjsODD ; !Don't want plural nouns to get the ahtes derivation
!                                     +Abe:%>adak        K-CONS           ; !Not for odd-syllable se
!                                     +Abe:%>ada         K-VOW            ;

!!€gt-norm: jáhkoguojmitja # Odd-syllable test
!!€ jáhkoguojmitja:            jáhkoguojmitja+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ jáhkoguojmitjijt:          jáhkoguojmitja+N+Pl+Acc

LEXICON SNJIERÁGA !!= @CODE@ Odd syllable pluralforms only. These have corresponding singular stems.
                                +Cmp/SgNom:%>            R                ;
                                +Cmp/PlGen:%>ij          R                ;
                                   +Pl+Nom:%>a           K-VOW            ;
                                   +Pl+Gen:%>ij          K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Acc:%>ijt         K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Ill:%>ijda        K-VOW            ;
                                   +Pl+Ine:%>ijn         K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Ela:%>ijs         K-CONS           ;
                                   +Pl+Com:%>ij          K-CONS           ;
                                      +Ess:%>in          K-CONS           ;
                                          :%>i           DAGI_PLURAL      ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»attja%>      K-VOW            ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»attja%>j     K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»attja%>jt    K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»attja%>jda   K-VOW            ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»attja%>jn    K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»attja%>js    K-CONS           ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»attja%>j     K-CONS           ;
                         +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»attja%>      DAGI_PLURAL      ;
                     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»attja%>n     K-CONS           ;
                     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+Use/NG:»adtja%>n     K-CONS           ; !Gives snjierágadtjan, barely not used
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»attja»tja    K-VOW            ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»attja»tjij   K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»attja»tjijt  K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»attja»tjijda K-VOW            ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»attja»tjijn  K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»attja»tjijs  K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»attja»tjij   K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»attja»tjin   K-CONS           ; !Dobbel diminutiv
!                                         :»             DenominalAdjsODD ; ! Don't want plural nouns to get the ahtes derivation
!+Abe:%>adak K ; Not for odd-syllable stems
!                                   +N+Abe:%>ada         K                ;

!!€gt-norm: guovlloådåsa # Odd-syllable test
!!€ guovlloådåsa:            guovlloådåsa+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ guovlloådåsijt:          guovlloådåsa+N+Pl+Acc
