src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
bárnitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group:bárnitj IEDNITJA ;
bådnjitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:bådnjitj IEDNITJA ;
gujnatja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gujnatj IEDNITJA ; ! Kujnna Kintel
guovlloådåsa+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Domain:guovllo#ådås SNJIERÁGA ;
gájmitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:gájmitj IEDNITJA ;
gállasjguojmitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:gállasj#guojmitj IEDNITJA ;
gállatja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:gállatj IEDNITJA ;
gálojinitja+v1+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:gálojinitj IEDNITJA ;
gálojinitja+v2+N+Allegro+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:gálinitj IEDNITJA ;
gámasgálsoga+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Clth:gámas#gálsog9 SNJIERÁGA ;
iednitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:iednitj IEDNITJA ;
iehkedisådåsa+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Prod-audio_Prod-vis:iehkedis#ådås SNJIERÁGA ;
iehketådåsa+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Prod-audio_Prod-vis:iehket#ådås SNJIERÁGA ;
jáhkoguojmitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:jáhko#guojmitj IEDNITJA ;
lávitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:lávitj IEDNITJA ;
manjitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:manjitj IEDNITJA ;
maŋeplávitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:maŋep#lávitj IEDNITJA ;
muohtátja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:muohtátj IEDNITJA ;
nuorjoga+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:nuorjog9 SNJIERÁGA ;
nuppátlávitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:nuppát#lávitj IEDNITJA ;
oappátja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:oappátj IEDNITJA ;
rádnatja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:rádnatj IEDNITJA ;
sahppasa+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sahppas IEDNITJA ;
snjierága+v1+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:snjierág9 SNJIERÁGA ;
snjierága+v2+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sjnjierág9 SNJIERÁGA ;
tjietjitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:tjietjitj IEDNITJA ;
tjuodtjama+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjuodtjam SNJIERÁGA ;
uksabellusa+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Buildpart:uksa#bellus IEDNITJA ;
vieljatja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:vieljatj IEDNITJA ;
vuostasjlávitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:vuostasj#lávitj IEDNITJA ;
válldára+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:válldár SNJIERÁGA ;
áhtjitja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:áhtjitj IEDNITJA ;
ånibåvsåtja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Clth:åni#båvsåtj SNJIERÁGA ;
æddnutja+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:æddnutj IEDNITJA ;
